Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 20
LOCAL GOVERNMENT REGULATION OF LAND USE

Law reviews.

For article, "Vested Property Rights in

C

olorado: The Legislature Rushes in Where ....", see Den. U. L. Rev. 31 (1988); for article, "

C

ooperative Management of Urban Growth Areas Through IGAs", see 29 Colo. Law. 85 (Nov. 2000); for article, "Transferable Development Rights and Their Application in Colorado: An Overview", see 34 Colo. Law. 75 (March 2005).

Section

PART 1 LOCAL GOVERNMENT LAND USE
CONTROL ENABLING ACT

PART 2 REGULATORY IMPAIRMENT
OF PROPERTY RIGHTS

PART 3 ADEQUATE WATER SUPPLY